Massachusetts, session 194th, S2043.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32D of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “$6,000,000”, each time it appears,
and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- “12,000,000"; and,
Said section is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “9,000,000””, each time
it appears, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- “18,000,000”.
SECTION 2. For the purposes of this section, the total receipts thresholds shall increase
by the percentage of the Consumer Price Index from the previous calendar year issued by the
federal Bureau of Labor Statistics or shall remain the same in the even of a decrease in the
Consumer Price Index.
of 1